Vermont statutes. Title 1 General Provisions
Chapter 7. Legal Holidays; Commemorative Days

§ 371.
Legal holidays.

The following shall be legal holidays:

New Year’s Day, January 1;

Martin Luther King, Jr.’s Birthday, the third Monday in January;

Presidents’ Day, the third Monday in February;

Town Meeting Day, the first Tuesday in March;

Memorial Day, the last Monday in May;

Independence Day, July 4;

Bennington Battle Day, August 16;

Labor Day, the first Monday in September;

Indigenous Peoples’ Day, the second Monday in October;

Veterans’ Day, November 11;

Thanksgiving Day, the fourth Thursday in November;

Christmas Day, December 25.

All State departments, agencies and offices shall observe any legal holiday which falls on a Saturday on the preceding Friday and any legal holiday which falls on a Sunday on the following Monday; however, all other conditions of employment related to legal holidays, including decisions such as the closing or opening of State offices and compensation for work performed on such a day, shall be proper matters for collective bargaining pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 904

.

The provisions of this section shall not affect any collective bargaining agreement in existence on the effective date hereof.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 202

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. date, see note set out below;

1973, No. 71

, § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974;

1973, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; eff. March 11, 1974;

1975, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 6, 1976;

1985, No. 251

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2003, No. 83

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2017, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 20;

2019, No. 18

, § 2.

§ 372.
Arbor Day.

The first Friday in the month of May of each year is hereby designated as “Arbor Day.”

§ 373.
American History Month.

That February of each year is hereby designated as American History Month, and the Governor of the State of Vermont is requested and authorized to issue annually a proclamation inviting the people of the State of Vermont to observe such month in schools, churches, and other suitable places with appropriate ceremonies and activities.

HISTORY:

1961, No. R-28, app. Feb. 23, 1961.

§ 374.
POW-MIA Recognition Day.

The third Friday in the month of September is designated as “POW-MIA Recognition Day.”

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 82

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Sept. 18, 1998.

§ 375.
Juneteenth.

The third Saturday of the month of June is designated as “Juneteenth National Freedom Day.”

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 376.
Health Care Career Awareness Month.

October of each year is designated as Health Care Career Awareness Month.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 31a.

§ 377.
Green Up Day; River Cleanup Month.

The first Saturday in the month of May is designated as Green Up Day.

September of each year is designated as River Cleanup Month.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2019, No. 50

, § 3.